District of Columbia statutes.
11-946

Rules of court.

The Superior Court shall conduct its business according to the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure and the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure (except as otherwise provided in Title 23) unless it prescribes or adopts rules which modify those Rules. Rules which modify the Federal Rules shall be submitted for the approval of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, and they shall not take effect until approved by that court. The Superior Court may adopt and enforce other rules as it may deem necessary without the approval of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals if such rules do not modify the Federal Rules. The Superior Court may appoint a committee of lawyers to advise it in the performance of its duties under this section.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 487, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1973 Ed., § 11-946.
1981 Ed., § 11-946.
This section is referenced in § 16-701.
Public assistance, action for support, responsible relatives, see § 4-213.01.
Tax Division rules and regulations, see § 11-1203.
Superior Court rules, applicability to Small Claims and Conciliation Branch, see § 16-3901.
Subpoenas, see § 11-942.
Professional bondsmen, rules concerning, see § 23-1108.
Process, see § 11-943.
District of Columbia Court of Appeals, rules, see § 11-743.
Criminal Division rules and regulations, see § 16-701.
Attachment and garnishment of wages, rules of procedure concerning, see § 16-581.
Admission to bar, rules, see § 11-2501.